https://youtube.com/playlist?list=PLX4wRfv17ulevMZlzRiK-Vj1wGTPxlb3Z&si=FqzEXFPH8eODLWZB

4. Bob Ferguson on Former President Donald Trump assassination attempt by komo news Jul 14, 2024, etc

Well, Bob, you've seen the news out of Pennsylvania? I don't need to brief you on it. What's your initial reaction to what you've seen and heard it? 

Well, initial reaction, I suspect Chris was like most Americans, which was complete shock, you know, you just never expect that to happen and so thankful. Obviously, you know that the former President is okay apparently, but obviously, you know, deeply upsetting that apparently in it, a rally attendee was killed. And so you know, it's, it's a, it's a shocking situation all around, there's no toys around it. 

You have attended your fair share of political rallies Uber time, yeah, there's some questions or there's a lot we don't know right now about what exactly transpired here, but in terms of your personal safety and security. Now, with with rallies, going forward and political events going forward, anything. That you may do differently. 

Oh, that's a tough question for some, you know if I don't cue the talk much about sort of threats that I receive my family receives as just sort of a personal choice but and for you, my kids are very rare, you know of the situation and and and that's very unfortunate side of politics, I mean, it's not new to 2024 I mean. Go back to 1968 Wright marluther king and Bobby candy assassinate within. I think weeks of each other if I recall correctly. 

But you know, today is a reminder of you know, the worst impulses in America, you know that those are there and this is the time to try and calm everybody down so this doesn't escalate why things did 1968, as one historical example. 

I think a lot of people are already talking about political rhetoric and how and there have been concerns about political violence, you know, it's, it's difficult to talk about in a situation like this, that's still developing, but Republican party chair in Washington, state said, Hey, he was worried about this, because of all. The things that have been said About President Trump there have been things said about President Biden as well, I know that on the campaign trail you've talked about protecting Washington State from a potential Trump presidency. 

Do you do you think now about words and and political rhetoric as we as we move forward? 

Well, I don't just think about now after for a cowardly attack. No, during my time Attorney General Donald Trump was present. You know, we sell our disagreements in a courtroom, which I think is the right way to do it, it was legal briefs. 

I have aimed watching my press conferences during those 4 years, but it's gonna pretty calm, you know. Okay. I was had my personal views about what was going on, but we sell those different differences in court, which I think weights should be, you know, through the ballot box through the court system through debates right? 

And you know, I know the things do get here, but I think it is a reminder. That Hey, we can't be joking about things. Our words do matter. 

And I think one can have strong debate and disagreement as we should as a society that's important to express those differences, but there are lines obviously and oh, and that we certainly have been mindful of every day, not just today. 

Is this shape the state race in any way less than a month now before the primary 

You know, I haven't had a chance to I think that, through honestly, Chris, I mean, I just, I just don't know the answer to that, you know I need to focus now is on what happened and you know for the innocent victim here. They have thoughts for that individual and their family who must be. Suffering? 

Tremendously today and thankful that President Trump by my understanding Sin 3 physically healthy, but I'm sure that and for him, this must be a fairly traumatic experience. I can only imagine for him and his family. I mean, this is he has a wife he has children, he has a family, I mean, I guess I'm focused just on the human aspect of that, you know what that means for. 

Those who love him and his family members and what that might be must be like to have your father have this happen to you, you know, so, which is more focused on that than a broader political context for sure. 

I appreciate you doing this and I appreciate you sticking around while we no, it's breaking news. 

I'm happy to do it with you. Happy to do it. Thanks so much Christian a great night, thanks, Bob. 

Okay. Okay. Alright, I'm now recording, so II guess Bob. 

The first question is rather open-ended. You've been fighting Tim island for years, what do you think of today's ruling? 

Sure, I'll just be clear. It's I don't use a personal fight with delightment. He's been violating our campaign finance laws and accepting illegal kickbacks a whole long time, and that's not okay. 

And so it's a complete and other victory. And the good news is, he's being held accountable to the rule of law, and that's what matters soon. 

Can you explain how this case was different than I know you made the case? He was enriching himself from these campaigns, what what's the difference from enriching himself or making a living? 

Sure. Well, Tim Lyman had options here. He's been in trouble before with getting illegal kickbacks, right. 

That's a violation of the past. Well, guess what he just kept doing it after a tearful confession that he never do it again. And what the difference ISIS, you can earn a salary doing work on behalf initiative. 

But here's the deal you gotta be transparent with the public about that you've got to show how much you're making what you can't do what to my mind. Most certainly was doing was accepting illegal feedbacks, accepting donations to a cause and then illegally funneling those dollars, hundreds of thousands of dollars to yourself for personal purposes and not disclosing that Your donors or to the public, if that's illegal, that's an illegal kickback, and that's precisely what he was doing again. 

Do you think that he was running these campaigns to continue on with the living? The life that he's been living? And that was the motivation for some of these campaigns, I mean, he ran for governor last year at a time when when he owed the state money and and was embroiled in this. 

Did you think that he was He was running campaigns to enrich himself to tell payoff, some of his debts. 

Well, I guess I don't know exactly what his motivations were what I can tell you is precisely what the judge held today that over recent years, many years engage in a pattern of perception with the public and enriched themselves with illegal kickbacks. It's really as simple as that, and that's not okay, it's not how our system works and so It's worth pointing out the judge, determined his violations were egregious and they were intentional, he knew what he was doing, and he did it anyway. And that's what I found so frustrating about this piece is, he just seemed not to care. 

We thought the rules are not applied wrong. I thought he'd get away with it. But the good news is today. 

After a long a Longport battle, he lost complete. 

What Is the What's the idea behind the number? The 2.6 million you had you had sought a number triple that the judge if there was one minor victory for Mr. Ivan's day, was the fact that the judge didn't agree to that tripling of the fine, what was the idea behind that number that you saw? 

Well, to be clear, yeah, time 'em and engaged in so many violations of campaign finance laws, but he literally faced millions of dollars in penalties. We tried to arrive at a number that we thought was appropriate for accountability. I didn't spite the football too much we could ask for millions more as the judge pointed out. 

In fact, the judge accepted our number of about 2.6 million as essentially the baseline. We then said, because he acted potentially the law allows the judge to crip a penalty, if someone does things potentially the judge bowed it to moment active attention, he knew he did it anyway, withdraw all the factors and agree with them, he said he wasn't going to triple the penalty frankly, because it's not bad to speak too much. That's the judge's call, and we certainly accept that we thin $2.6 million, which is The bar exceeds what any individual has ever paid in watching and say it's a record-setting penalty certainly is sufficient for accountability. 

In addition, as a judge pointed out, we can seek our cost of fees for having to bring this piece against alignment and we will most certainly doing that it'll be paying quite a bit more to cover taxpayers, possibly fees for having a written in the station for this, please. 

What about the argument that he's made that? This is the Attorney General's office trying to stop the initiative process trying to stop him from running initiatives. 

The good news for Tim mindman is nothing stops him from conceiving of initiative campaign for one. This part is what he can do I understand that Simon wants to make this all about me, he wants to personalize he calls me fascist burden, right eye, I get that my job, Chris, just to my head down with my team and follow the law and frankly ignore all the rhetoric that comes into mindman and just focus on the facts. And the good news is that's what Judges do ignore the rhetor they focused on the facts and the judge even said, I have no real will to you, Mr. 

iron, but you gotta follow the law and you've not been doing it, and that's when our system of justice is frankly all. About so for me, it's not personal, I don't take any personal joy. From this, but it's an important victory for transparency in our election respiratorship. 

It prevents him from handling any money. Finances involved with initiatives in the future c*** 

But that's exactly right, in fact, because of the previous violation, he was told he could no longer be a treasure for a campaign because he was gonna kick back some past well, that clearly did not deter him from praying this complicated system scheme, the judge called it it fitbacks again. So, this time, what the judge said. You can't be handling the money at all judge. 

If the judge granted that request, which we think is appropriate look to Miami can engage in the political process and conceive initiatives, you can advocate for them. That's our process, whether I agree with them or not is irrelevant, we cannot do. And the judge emphasized. 

It's ignore the law. They personally profit and accept illegal feedbacks and not tell the public. That part's not okay. 

So we have not heard from timinen yet, as we're talking about 

I'm straight, right? 

But, do you do you expect him to appeal? Do you expect him to seek higher court on this? 

That's his call to me. I mean, all I can say Chris is if he does, he's gonna lose. I mean, this has been people on battle is worth emphasizing, he's been in attempt of court for months. 

In this case, he's had to pay thousands and thousands $50 times the advice because you would not turn over bank records. He finally got them, but he obstructed our investigation? And all he did was delay the day of reckoning that finally arrived for timmon in court today. 

What if he decides? He doesn't have the money declares bankruptcy like he has in the past and and doesn't pay off what what happens in that case? 

Well, I mean, we'll see what comes next, right? But, uh, our intention is to click and to collect the cost of fees that we incurred for having to bring this case against him. I'm who lied, who cheated, I will obstructed our investigation, who's in contempt of court month after month after month by making really See, I'm just nosed at the judicial system and my team would be a nice way of putting it and there's a cost for that and that day is right, right? 

This was the very first story knocked on when I first ran for office. I took on a 20 year incumbent, thank you very much, Mr. spoiler. 

I really appreciate that. We were undergongs for sure, as the son of a public school teacher and a Boeing employee, I didn't have any political connections, big endorsements or personal money. So I knocked on 22000 doors instead nice to set for 20 years. 

Yeah, 20 years, we surprised everyone and won, but since they promised to change county politics, establishment, insiders eliminated my district. And we were forced to run again, I guess another long time ago we knocked on even more doors and one I dedicated, every waking hour on the county council and now is Attorney General to taking on powerful interests on behalf of washingtonians, in my view, the future of the Constitution is at stake joining me now is. Washington State Attorney General Bob Ferguson, Washington's Attorney General says here's a plan to make millions more eligible to receive charity care. 

I take on anybody who isn't playing by the rules as your Attorney General? There are really any precedent for using campaign statements to establish impermissible motive job as Attorney General is to hold the rule of law in this country and I'll use every tool that I have as Attorney General to make sure that the President follows that constitution, but we have veterans who are gaining. Their medications and the time they wait senior citizens locking their prescriptions. 

It's a serious problem here in Washington State, and because we're right. We've won, this looks to me like you want to hear like you like you beat them in 

And you've made them conceive that they have 

Get lost is that how you see it without any question? The fact is, big, multinational corporations have too much power government at times has too much power and they stand in the way of every Washingtonian, having the opportunity to succeed, I'm proud to have defeated polluters, scam artists, cheaters and held them accountable so our great state can thrive, so small businesses can prosper. So people get the healthcare they need. 

So sandwich can compete to hold big corporations accountable so future generations can breathe our air and drink our water. I think that what people want in their Attorney General if some of your fight for them, but they feel like that person is using the tools of their office to fight on their behalf, what I like is that. 

He is not playing politics. This person is putting workers ahead of politics and is willing to do the right thing. When Donald Trump attacked women and students and working people, time and time again, Bob Ferguson stood up for what is right and I want to personally thank him for that? 

To me, Bob Ferguson is someone who is a true leader, and he does not need to show himself or to be the spokesperson, but he is able to use his wits as talents as team and values to push forward to what's importance. 

I pretty much went up to him and asked him to take a picture with me and I told him thank you so much for doing this for protecting and responding to this unconstitutional and immoral act against people like me. 

Bob Ferguson showed app for me in a way that was really meaningful and helpful to me in the aftermath of this horrific shooting in muckleteo, where my son was nearly taken, and I witnessed the grief of 3 families who've lost their young children here is Washington State's highest law enforcement officer. He's already got legislation drafted to change things. 

I propose addressing ghost guns that's been adopted. I proposed for 6 years of banning high capacity magazines to which that your last year adopted that change. Now it's time to ban the sale of assault weapons on proposing that as well, what he's been doing for our most harmed communities from the opioid epidemic. 

Is huge? What I really love about him is I believe he's the only Attorney General that turns down the offers. 

So let's talk about the result in the endgame of swinging. 

Yeah, it's a 1/2 a billion dollars that's coming to wash in all the local jurisdictions. 

If you think about how fortunate Washington State is to have an Attorney General like you, you have taken on some of our most high-profile cases, things that are against the toughest, most cruel opponents. And you've done it on our behalf for the people, a champion for everyone in Washington State. 

When your first campaign has gets a 20 year of COVID, and it's a grassroots operation, and you've only got your friends and family to support you. I don't think you ever lose sight of what that campaign was about, and I think it was very freeing to come into politics. Not only anybody anything other than frankly doing right? 

By all those people I talk to what I like most about being Attorney General. Is it gives me the opportunity, the fight on behalf of washingtonians, every single day? And that's what I want to continue doing is being an advocative for all washingtonians, in any way that I can 

Hello, everyone. My name is cat oriel with Forbes breaking news, and today I'm here raguashi state Attorney General Bob Ferguson, who is now running for governor thanks so much for joining me today? 

Well, thanks for having me on. I really appreciate that. 

Oh of course, and so for those that might be unfamiliar, can you tell me about your background how it's led you to where you are today? You know, you're run for doctor. 

Sure. Well, I'm fourth generation, washingtonians, my family's been here a long time, and for the past decade or so I've been the Attorney General for Washington State, and that's going to be the opportunity to it will be part of the people's law firm that advocates on. Behalf of washingtonians, to protect them from the Trump administration, that's violating the rights. 

We want many lawsuits against your administration. To holding opioid distributors accountable for fueling the opioid epidemic and bringing back more than a billion dollars for people to say to Washington and standing up for consumers. So on all those issues, it's been a real joy to be Attorney General. 

But now, as you said, okay for any per governor we have an open seat here in 2024. It's going to be a close election, but we're really excited about the way the campaign's going. 

Was there a turning point when you knew you wanted to run for governor? 

That's a great question. Always a little hard to answer. It's never like a moment, but I would say that, you know, I do believe in general, that one2 years as long I've been like I said, Attorney General now, for more than a decade, I think one2 years is a long time to serve in any executive role in state government, like attorney, general or or like governor. 

And so parkmore is called very hard to leave the ag's office. I feel like you know, I had 12 years to lead. I had 12 years to hopefully put my imprint on the office in a way that hopefully is a positive one and of course, with our current governor jansley decided not to run for election that created an opening right, where there was a vacancy in the office, and so it was a logical time to think about that had been aging for 12 years now there's a vacancy. 

And combined with the fact that you know our state faces a lot of urgent challenges and I'm excited to try and address those challenges that we're facing as a state. I'm in a different role, which would be governed and so for a combination of reasons, I think it felt like an exciting time. To try and take on this new challenge. 

And like you've said, you've been in this position for quite a while, so I do want to dig into some of your accomplishments as Washington State ag, because there's been so many notable things you've done you believe they're doing already, but I think a lot of people. Would be familiar with you for finding a lawsuit back in 2017 challenging of the executive order signed by then President Donald Trump, which was dubbed the Muslim ban. So can you talk to me about that lawsuit and how I guess? 

Did that moment at all, change the course of your career trajectory? 

Oh, it, it changed a lot of my life in a lot of ways, I imagine cat. And in part because I was the first Attorney General to challenge Donald Trump, as you mentioned that first version of the Muslim travel ban, he signed it within a couple weeks of being President. And so my team and I filed a lawsuit within just a couple days, we worked on over the weekend and followed the lawsuit challenging that person Muslim travel ban and eventually won One, it was upheld, and then eventually, Donald Trump dropped that one and eventually adopted a more narrow version of the Muslim travel ban. 

So, you know, for me, I just felt that that executive order was, you know, unconstitutional, obviously, but all also I found it deeply immoral action for a present take. 2? Impact that many individuals and we literally had washingtonians from those 7 affected countries who were traveling abroad, favorite conferences at a relative's funeral and could not come back to their own country. 

I could not come back to watch and see because of that action. So I would say, winning that case. Each it brought a lot of attention to, you know to me, he just without a high-profile piece and so obviously you have an experience like that and you find yourself on national TVA lot and you're going to get more attention. 

So in a lot of ways. Sure I'm sure it changed my life in some ways, but the most important thing for me. And the most important thing for my team is we felt a sense of accomplishment is stopping that first Muslim travel ban that was like, I said, unconstitutional, and really, I found to be a deeply offensive action. 

Yeah, and I noticed a tweet that your campaign put out a few days ago where he talked about also holding the Biden administration accountable for abusing executive authority, I'm less familiar with that. Can you tell me a little bit what you've done since spider has become President and also how? You're going to translate these experiences as governor how would you hold either Biden or Trump accountable if either want to be re-elected? 

Sure. So, yeah, as I often say, Donald Trump is not even the first President, I found the lawsuit against that would have been against Barack Obama's administration. I'm a Democrat, look, there's no political read, or I respect more than Barack Obama just to be clear, but there is an issue here in Washington State, I'll sparing the details, but there was an issue here in washing state where We have what's called the hampered nuclear waste in the Central part of our state, that's managed by the federal government, it's very dangerous work to try to clean up that nuclear waste and keep it safe as you might imagine and workers, there are beginning stick on the job site for many years and after I became Attorney General, I met with those workers and decided the only way to stop. 

If the harm doesn't cause them for an unsafe or condition was to file a lawsuit against the administration, it happened to be Barack Obama's administration and we won that case and workers now have a safe work environment, so obviously, through the Trump years, we had a lot of litigation against donald Trump, we ended up. Filing Washington State. My older joined 99 different lawsuits against the administration really lost 2 or 3 of those cases we had a lot of success there. 

And most recently, the Biden administration, we have a case that's ongoing, that's been successful so far to ensure access to microprystone. That's the medication used for abortion medication. It's using more than half of abortions all across the country, and here in Washington State, we file a lawsuit against the administration, saying that they were putting unreasonable restrictions on the access to mifipristone, which is very important in a postdot, the world that that medication should be It has rarely available as any safe product which it is, and so that's why we filed a lawsuit so far, that's been going well, and we've been able to ensure access to that individuals here in Washington State, 2 mifepristones, so the litigation against presence has been significant, I think your small question was Hey, how does that impact me? 

Maybe as a governor I think what I would say, is it communicates the voter set, I'm going to stand up to presence of both political parties or their rights for the recrupted freedom, the first safe or compartment for their civil rights, I'm willing to do that, and Are you real a lot about ags without lawsuits against presidents? But guess what? It's almost always a present of the opposite political party, I have an equal opportunity in my filings of those cases and number 2 I think it's important for the people to know that look, if Donald Trump gets elected again or not. 

I think there is A There's a chance of that we will meet a governor who has some experience in standing up to an administration. That's trying to take away the rents and certainly that is an experience I didn't think I had when I went to law school was having a lot of litigation against presidents, but I have and I think that experience would serve me well if I'm elected governor. I think Donald Trump is the President of the United States. 

You mentioned abortion? I'm sure that'll be part of your next answer. But what do you find the biggest issues are basically Washington State, and what would your main priorities be as governor and related to that, you know you're willing to push back against your own party? 

Do you find that any of your viewpoints differ at all from the mainstream Democratic Party? 

Well, I guess what I would say is you know, I think that actions sort of speak louder than words. You know when I first ran for office cat. About 20 years ago I ran against incumbent Democrat for local county office, I'm in Seattle right now. 

In silicon county, I ran against an incumbent Democrat who was chair of the county council who've been there for 20 years now, that's not the easy way in to run as a nobody Democrat against an incumbent popular Democrat. I took that incumbent Democrat on him and won, and so yeah, I've been willing to okay. It's my party where I think it's the right thing either politically or filing lawsuits or whatever I think is where my principles leave me. 

It's something that's important for voters to know in terms of the race The good news in this race is there will be a clear contrast between me and Dave Reichert paid records of former Congressman Republican, who will almost assuredly be the Republican nominee. And you mentioned choice, you know, he is anticoise our Seattle Times newspaper here refers to him as an anti-choice. Stalwart. 

I mean, he's just, that's just where he is, and that is not where the overwhelming majority of washingtonians are and again in a post dogs world where reproductive freedom is being taken away state-by-state by state, the last thing we need in washing state is to elect a governor this anti. Choice wants to take away your freedoms number 2. To mention Donald Trump again, you know, Dave Reichert's last 2 years in Congress happened to be donald Trump's first 2 years as President. 

The good news, is there are independent groups that evaluate your voting record when you're in Congress and more than one of those groups, let's point out. That Dave Reichert voted with Donald Trump more than 92% of the time. To just put that in some perspective that's voting with Donald Trump more often than Mitch McConnell, more often than Ted Cruz more often than Matthew gates. 

And so that's a level of extremism that II just, you know, it's gonna be my job to make sure that watch. Antonians understand I would Donald Trump was present. Steve Reicher, in fact, the political courage to stand up to him and in fact, voted with them time after time after time, in contrast, I was the first attorney Attorney General to take on Donald Trump and be him and be in the court. 

Many, many times again, just stand up for the rights of all Washington so. That's a contrast that will be emphasizing to the voters as well. 

Well, the polls are showing the race. It's extremely tight between the 2 views. So why do you think the polls are so close, given all the you know, examples that you shared about record and that Washington is a deeply police state. 

Yeah, I'm glad you brought that up because one thing I'm trying to communicate to so all my supporters out here is exactly how close I think this race will be, and that's just not me just thinking that I think it's because we've seen in the past, how close those. Races are and how people think of watching saved as this deep blue state. That's not really true when you look at the last 2 campaigns for governor and Washington State, where there was no one coming like this one, so nobody has the advantage of incumbency and the last 2 campaigns were governor in those situations, the total March in the victory for the 2 Democrats who won is. 

3% points in one election, Chris bravoir, a former Attorney General she won by a 133 votes literally. Our current governor won a very close hard pot race by about 3% points. So for me, I just look back at me pass performance and when it comes to open seats for governors in Washington State. 

Oh, yes, it leans blue, those races will be very competitive, and we know that Dave Ryker will have millions and millions and millions of dollars. I've naked events in this campaign, so that's why we're campaigning very hard. I've already been to all 39 counties in the state we're on a swing back a second time throughout 39 counties, I'm the only candidate that's done that, and so we're campaigning, very, very hard 

So my last question for you, it is the election year so I want to ask you about the presidential race as well. We're about a month away from the gop presidential primary in Washington, state election officials have already confirmed Trump saying will be on ballot or with your reactions left. 

I mean, like I can't say, I was too shocked by that I know, there's obviously we're following closely the legal proceedings that are going on. And so the courts will take care of that. Um, but I am Phil honestly for a long long time that Donald Trump was going to be the nominee of the Republican party. 

With my mom and dad were Republicans here in Washington State, they were active Republicans, but the party that they we're involved in in the 60s and the 70s and the 80s, it is not the Republican party of today, it's it's been turned over to Donald Trump and all that he stands for and so That's unfortunate you're coming from parents who over very active Republicans, it's sad where that party's gone. That's going to be my job in this campaign to make very clear to the voters that Dave Reichert has really just been a lockstep with that new Republican party. 

During his time in Congress, so we expect a close race, but we're excited on what's it? 

Keith Ferguson. Thank you so much for joining me today. 

Oh, thank you so much. Hope you have a great day. Individuals have a right to feel safe in their communities with their kids with their loved ones as they go about their daily lives and that is a message I've heard not surprisingly over and over and over again? 

The state of Washington has the fewest law enforcement officers per capita in the entire u. Yes. Bob Ferguson says that is unacceptable, it would change if he's elected as governor Ferguson says he would hire and train more state troopers and provide grant funding for cities and counties to boost their ranks. 

Ferguson wants to hire Cold Case detectives to look into cases, understaffed agencies have had to set aside, while also expanding drug treatment to help those battling it. 

Addiction, nothing is more batting, for parents. I've spoken to when they say, Bob, I've got a child who's suffering from addiction. It took years before they were ready to get treatment once they were, they told me it's 8 weeks before I get him or her in the door look, I cannot imagine as a parent having that experience 

Husband and father of teenage twins is proud of his public safety accomplishments as the state's Attorney General since 2012, he backed the law banning the sale of guns to find his assault weapons and helped reduce the backlog of untested rape kits. But critics blame Ferguson and other Democrats for supporting laws those. Critics feel are too lenient on criminals. 

Creating a public perception at Washington, it's a great place to commit crimes. Did you and your party help us get to? Where we are you have been in a position where if we could have gone after? 

Maybe some of these crimes a little earlier, what do you say that? 

For those critics, well, let's be clear virtually everybody who is a sexually violent writer at the Neil island was put there. It's by me and my team local law enforcement officials across the state, whether they're Republican prosecutors or Democrats turn to my office take on some of the most serious felonies. We have across our state. 

They know they can trust my team to prosecute those folks to the full 6 and the law. But we are using the powers we have as a train general to assist local law enforcement solve coal cases go after bad actors role as governor what folks can expect is take that same approach that same mentality, which is going after the bad actors and calling them accountable. That's the my priorities Attorney General and that's going to continue as a government. 

Now, some of those same critics say that the police restrictions on those police pursuits are what have caused this increase in crime in the state in just this month, legislators voted to roll back those restrictions. Bob Ferguson says, that is a good idea. And he noted, he was not a supporter of those original restrictions when they were passed here back in 2021. 

And true, along with new governor voters are going to be faced with 3 initiatives on the November ballot. What does Ferguson think about those 

He said he was going to vote no on all 3, and there's one to let people opt out of the long-term care program. And then there are measures to repeal both the climate commitment act and the capital gains tax on the climate commitment act, Bob Ferguson says that is good policy, although he says if. He's governor he would tweak it a little bit to make sure the example he used was that farmers are treated a little more fairly so, but he will be voting no on all of those initiatives. 

All right, great exclusive. Thanks so much drew Nicholson in Olympia. One of these bop fergusons will appear second on the ballot, the other will feel third on the ballot, and I appear number 13 on the 

About earlier this month, Attorney General Bob Ferguson said, the other Bob ferguson's violated state law trying to confuse voters with what he called dirty tricks to differentiate between all the fergusons on the ballot Secretary of State, Steve Hobbes decided to add occupations to their names. And the Attorney General lists to the office he's held since 2013, the other 2 fergusons ended up dropping out of the race, but before that the attorney general's campaign sent a letter to secretary Hobbs telling him quote, you must also adjust the order in which the 3 candidates names appear that we? 

It wasn't Will you please do this? It was? You must do this you, you must change the ballot order and to me. 

That's what set off my alarm bells, because that is there's a clear violation of the law shouldn't be happening. 

State senator mark mullett is 1 of 28 candidates for governor her fellow Democrat says Bob Ferguson crossed the line when ferguson's campaign told the state's head of elections to move ferguson's name above the other Bob ferguson's. I was a bit surprised because clearly in the RCW it says that you can't switch it at all, it's determined by law secretary Hobbes says the RCW the revised code of Washington State law is clear. Names are listed on a ballot. 

According to numbers randomly drawn like bingo numbers, he says. His staff and lawyers from the Attorney General's office recommended against moving around any names, there would be a high amount of risk if I were to reorder it, which meant high risk of losing in court. Bob Ferguson was not available for an on camera interview. 

In a written statement, he says had the other fergusons appeared above the Attorney General's name. His campaign would have sued the state, claiming the Secretary of State has the authority to take steps to differentiate between candidates with similar names, adding quote. It's unfortunate that mark mullet does not support this simple act for election integrity. 

But perhaps the fact he would have benefited from that confusion explains his anti-democratic position Secretary of State Steve Hobbs is a Democrat and he has endorsed Sen. Mullen, not Bob Ferguson for governor but the Secretary of State. It says this decision on this issue was purely made for those legal reasons live in Olympia drew. 

Nicholson. 

They knew better, they knew what they were doing. They put profits ahead of the health involving of thousands of Washington's. 

4 drug companies are accused of fueling the opioid epidemic by pumping way, more narcotics into Washington than were ever needed hooking thousands of patients who later overdosed and died. 

It puts some sense of perspective in more than a dozen counties in Washington State. These distributors ship more prescriptions, not pills than there are people in a dozen counties in Washington State, several states. 

States are settling with those companies guaranteeing them hundreds of millions of dollars for treatment and prevention. But Attorney General Bob Ferguson just said no to a deal, which would have given Washington more tha $500 million. It's based out over nearly 20 years with certain conditions? 

The bottom line is, we will do better by taking them to trial, and we'll be asking for literally billions of dollars after we beat them in court. 

The trial is scheduled to start in September. Ferguson says Washington needs to win big to fund local programs designed to clean up for all the damage caused by opioid addiction. 

Money's important and we tend to get more than we would have with this element, but also we want accountability that day in court for those families. 

It's a gamble. Washington could go to court and lose the left with nothing, but Attorney General Ferguson says the state has been laying the legal groundwork for this trial to move forward soon. And he hopes for a verdict by the end of the year Jessica. 

Ted, have any other states gone to trial and have they won? 

Yeah, Oklahoma won about a 1/2 billion dollar verdict against Johnson & Johnson and Ferguson says that's a lot more than the state would have gotten. I've had it done a settlement. So he says it gives them some hope that Washington has a pretty good case here he also says the trial path is a lot more important. 

Because if you win in court, you get that money right away, you can start putting that to some of these recovery programs, if you do the settlement that money is spread out over decades. 

Very interesting Ted land reporting live for us in Seattle tonight. Ted, thank you. In washing state, you need a license to sell cigarettes, paper products, marijuana, alcohol, firearms, pharmaceutical drugs, insurance products and fireworks, you do not need a license to sell ammunition. 

We propose changing that If you are firearms dealers, your life doesn't change you already have a license but if you are a business that sells ammunition about firearms, you are not required to have a license that needs to change in Washington State. This new legislation sponsored by represent Amy Whalen of Kirkland who unfortunately had a conflict over the noon hour, at least she's receiving an award. She couldn't be here. 

She's our prime sponsor on that important new legislation. So that legislation will prohibit violent felons and others who are ineligible to own firearms from purchasing or possessing ammunition. That's important for step number 2, it makes it illegal for dealers to knowingly sell ammunition to violent offenders and other individuals who are prohibited from owning firearms. 

Also, the bill will require those who sell ammunition to obtain a firearm's license and lastly to require background checks. It's for all ammunition sales and that will take place. And this is important not to get too much of the details, but that will take place once the federal government expands access to, we call the knicks system that allows checks on ammunition under current federal law and again, I won't get too much of the details under current federal law. 

The knicks system, by the way, is an acronym and ICS for national instant criminal background check system. Right now, under current federal laws, nyx cannot be used to run a background check for ammunition. If there is a change in administration that may well change by passing this law, Washington would then be in a position to run background checks on the purchase of ammunition. 

These proposals will make our community safer, they are common sense they are constitutional and it is time to act on these common sense gun reform bills. And with that I'm going to turn over now to Sen. Cooter, who will be followed by represent Valdez, will be followed by represent Peterson, and then we'll open up to your questions, thanks again for being here and by the way, just before I turn over to Sen. 

kuter and the other legislators. Hi, you know, it's I just can't tell you how much I respect any elected official who's going to put their name on a piece of legislation like this, okay, you're going to buy controversy by doing that, you'll get some letters from folks of a different opinion right these. Legislators do not have to lead on it. 

They say, you know, if I've all supported, although for it, but I don't really need to be the prime sponsor on it. These individuals you're about to hear from are choosing not just to sponsor to be the lead sponsors, put their names on be the prime sponsors. To work to make these things happen to make these bill pass, that's true leadership right now and I just deeply appreciate all their efforts and their sacrifice and their leadership to make this happen. 

So, with that Sen. Patty Cooter. 

Well, I want to thank you first Attorney General Ferguson for your leadership on this very important issue. Also, my colleagues who are here from a at the house, I want to thank them for their leadership and also grandmothers against gun violence and groups like them. I've had the pleasure and opportunity and good fortune to be able to speak in front of some of these groups and I know their passion and quite honestly, it's their work that has really changed. 

In public opinion about common sense, gun legislation, which, from my standpoint, is long overdue, quite honestly enough was enough that Columbine for me and that was in 1989 our country has been struggling with a major issue with gun violence. We have more guns in our country than we have people. And the ability for a legislature to pass common sense legislation has been really hampered in large part by shell arguments and a lot of money, mainly from the NR. 

A. But we've now broken through that we saw at i1639 that the people of Washington want common sense gun legislation is And you have leaders who are in the legislature and in the Executive Branch right now that are willing to deliver that for the state of Washington, a constituent said to me just a few days ago a mother, she said she was concerned about her kids in school because they have active shooter drills when I was in school. We had tornado drills, there's a big difference, and we don't even know the psychological effect. 

On our young people of having to undergo active shooter drills, I want to change that everyone up here wants to change that because because as the Attorney General said enough is enough. 

Thank you, senator critterer my name is Javier valdest from the 46th legislative district. Actually, I do want to acknowledge my state senator who just arrived. Sen. 

did to Sen. David frog, so thank you for being here, David. I said, recruiter mentioned, you know enough is enough. 

I think we've heard from voter. We've heard from our constituents that it's time for Washington State to act, you know, it's unfortunate that over the last 5 to 6 years, we've had 30 mass shootings here in our country, and I'll just briefly go over to the sad reality and the sad steps. Newton, Connecticut 30 rounds, high compassion magazine used 26 individuals lost Aurora Colorado a 100 rounds used 12 deaths Orlando, Florida 30 rounds, 49 deaths Las Vegas, Nevada, 100 rounds, 100 rounds. 

We lost 58 soles, southern Texas 30 rounds, 26. That's Dayton, Ohio, recently, a 100 rounds, 9 deaths El Paso recently, 30 rounds, 22 deaths and even here in our state. Recently, we've had 2 incidences in Burlington and Michael Tino. 

Um? 

And it's been talking about, it's time for it's time for us to lead and watch in the state. It's time for us to act to join 8 other states who have these limits and it's long overdue, it's reasonable and there are exceptions, you know, law enforcement will. Be exempted from this. 

Our military will also be also be exempted, so we make sure that those protections are still in place. I'm optimistic that in a 2020 V that in 2020 session, we'll get something done. The bill that I found sponsored this in 2019 session was able to get it out of committee. 

Unfortunately, it still sits in rules committee, they were coming back strong, and we're coming back hard and went all of them. The support here among my colleagues and all of our wonderful allies here, I'm confident that we can get it done. And with that, I want to introduce my friend and my colleague, representative Sean Peters. 

Good afternoon, my name is Sean Peterson. I represent the 21st district. I'm proud that my mayor Mike Nelson is one of the leaders in our local communities, when it comes to common sense, you've got a reform, and that Paul Kramer, who is championing these issues, is also a constituent of the 21st district. 

But I want to thank you, Scott Ferguson for obviously his leadership on this, but also for pointing out that this coming Saturday is the anniversary of Sandy Hook. And unfortunately, we could have had this press conference on any number of days throughout the year and commemorated another mass shooting. We could have done this in August and talked about Odessa, Texas, where 7 people died. 

We could have done this at the end of October we talked about Pittsburgh. Now, the tree of life synagogue, where 11 people were murdered on February 14th, parkland Florida, 17 people like early October as Javier pointed out Las Vegas, Nevada, 58 deaths. June, we could have talked about Orlando and the pulse nightclub 49 deaths or of course, at the end of July, we could have talked about my community of Michael teo 43 were killed. 

The commonality among these places. Despite the disparate geographic location is the use of high capacity magazines. And assault style weapons. 

So that's why we're here today. That's why I'm proud to stand with the grandmothers against gun violence with my local elected officials with statewide, elected officials with my Senators with my fellow representatives to do something about this epidemic that's happening in all of our communities, here in Washington and across the state So thank you all for being here. I don't know if senator frost might want to say a few words. 

Thank you for I'll just echo what my colleagues have said, and I'm pleased to be here and the leadership of Gen. Ferguson and one of my great colleagues Sen. Cooter and I will just note particularly on the high capacity magazine issue that the issue is the amount of lethal killing force that can be. 

Accomplished in a matter of seconds. That is why those magazines may be appropriate for military use, but they should not be on our streets. And that's why I support this legislation I've supported in the past as a sponsor I'm glad Patty's taken it on right now and I look forward to working with this team and all these great groups from the alliance and grandmothers and everybody to help us get over the line this year, thank you. 

Thanks, David just a final thought before we take your questions. I think Patty Cooter mentioned this and WeChat about it. We were kind of gathering in a big conference room, we're all packed in there, and I mentioned that, you know, it comes to common sense, gun reform, you know, I say it all the time, but it's true that people are a way ahead of the politicians in the state, not these politicians obviously, right, but politicians as a whole. 

And look no further than initiative 1639 right, raise the age to purchase in a or 15, for example, from 18 to 21 to require a background check on that weapon, the same background checks that we have for a handgun to put that in effect as well, we propose that bill to the state legislature 2. Years running. The Florida, the Republican control legislature in Florida, passed that bill, right? 

We cannot get passed in the washing state legislature just by having a governor going to sign it. So what happened to people, right, it took it to the people through initiative, 1639 and over 59%, nearly 60% of Washington's past initiative 16. Every night that is overwhelming in the same age to get that kind of support. 

So when I say to people, our way hit the politicians, it's not an opinion, it is a fact, and I think that that the strong support from the people mission, 1639 will help fuel the support for taking these bills down. To the state legislature, so that will start questions here in the room, though, if folks are on the phone, which I think often there are we'll see if folks on the phone, have any questions. Anyone have any questions in the room here? 

This will be the easiest press conference I've ever had. So anyone on the phone have any questions they want to jump in. If you do, if you just don't mind introducing yourself would be great. 

I'm sorry, do my momma turn you up, sorry, I didn't quite. This is always dangerous. I'm going to ground, you might just make sure I don't want to to actually flip this thing on, hang on, just one thing I'm going to trap so we can hear you and she said, Kyle, go right ahead, okay, it's the Hannah from caliber right up. 

But there are some things you've proposed before and had its top 5 getting them died out there, places any particular reason you think you might have a better chance to discussion sure, so I'll invite the legislators who are really experts to jump in with their thoughts as well. I think we've alluded to some of the reasons I'll just start with 1 or 2, and others may want to jump in I do think with a strong public support for initiative 1639 informs, all elected officials precisely where the people are on common sense can reform loud and clear. 

It doesn't get much more overwhelming than that. So that's number 1 number 2, you know, like kind of any bill that's going to be a challenge. It often takes multiple years. 

That's just the way these things work, and you know that and the legislators know that and they' And particularly with high capacity magazines because Javier, we said, we got through commission, both the house and the senate, I recall correctly went to rules last year. We feel we have some momentum there, and perhaps I'll see if one of the other legislators want to add to reasons why they may feel optimistic that this year. As the next legislative session is It is here we feel we have a good chance to get one or all these done. 

Anybody else might be open, go to the tender? Introduce yourself on it? 

Sen. Patty Cooter from the 48th legislative district. I also think we have new legislators. 

We have new leadership and I think that that also makes a difference and again hearing from the public, the the amount of support that there is for common sense gun legislation now is really driving this, and again, I'm going to give a nod to grandmothers against gun violence and organizations similar to that. They have really put the wind in our cells, and they have stood app to organizations like the nra that has so long, had a stranglehold on legislatures across the country and our federal government for that matter. 

So I think the time is now and I think we're all cautiously optimistic, because these are controversial bills? We know that nothing is ever a slam dunk. But we are dedicated, I've been working on gun common sense gun legislation since I got into the legislature and I don't see that stopping anytime soon as long as we still have the need, thank you. 

Javier Valdez, 46th legislative district. I too remain optimistic. I mean, obviously, again, as Sen. 

Cooter alluded to that nothing just slammed up, but we have a lot of advocates who are out there every day championing this, and you know in the house, you know, we were able to get this out of committee, our civil rights Judiciary this in 2019 and unfortunately did not get onto the floor. But I do remain constantly optimistic because the chair of that committee will soon be our new speaker in our house. Lori Jenkins, and she has been a strong champion of sensible gun safety reform and so I remain optimistic that she will stay that way as and when she starts become her term as speaker in January and I certainly do all I can in making sure that I advocate with her as well as all my colleagues in the state legislature to get this done. 

Any other questions from those on the line before I come back to the room here, this Jim Gavin, from the spokescent review, what would happen to the high capacity magazines that are currently in in circulation in would you use the same definition of an assault weapon? The 1639 uses, which is essentially all semi-automatic. Rifles, yeah, so on the first question, Jim, this is not this builds, up to grandfather does not reach back and say, Hey, it's illegal to possess. 

Either a the an assault weapon or the high capacity magazine, so it would not be illegal to possess it. If you legally purchased it in the past and turn on your second question nothing in the definition that we have here, I would sort of conflict or require a 2/3 vote of legislature based on initiative 1639, so the definition we have just expand that I've been, we're happy to get you more information, Jim, but it's the same definition we've used the past, it's essentially identical to other states that have passed those and those have been upheld and it would not require 2/3 vote of the legislature, if and when the legislature takes up this upcoming session. 

Any other questions from those on the line if I get one last shot in here. Yes, it's Jim drew film, an Easter view, go ahead, Jim Attorney General, there wasn't. There weren't enough votes in the senate for the high capacity magaming a bill this year, if that's the same case next year? 

Do you think there should be a roll call vote anyway, so that the public can clearly know who's In favor and who's against it? Your question is getting applaused from the grandmother gets in violence just so, you know, sign over there on it. I guess what I'll say is what I've maybe 2 points and I'll invite others to weigh in as well, Google may or may not just shared the share this perspective, but but Couple thoughts, I have number one is. 

I am a 100% convinced that if the bill to limit height, fasting magazines gets to the floor of the house and gets the floor of the senate next year it passes, I've zeroed out in my mind that if individuals are required to vote on it, it passes. That's number 1 number 2 to your question. And one thing I have frequently said, is I proposed these bills in the past, and folks have heard me say, probably, these press conferences in the past as well, is. 

And it goes right to your question is, I think the people deserve to know where their liquid officials stand on these issues. It's a big issue. It's a high-profile issue, it's a public safety issue, it impacts our children, right? 

It's fundamental, and I think the people deserve to know where their elected officials know that. The people know who these elected officials were there on it, right, and they know where that they know where I am and to me. I think there are some issues that are so big, so fundamental that people deserve to know. 

So look, the legislators who are here are far more expert than I am a what's the right way to do these things, but I've always felt that they should be voted on for those reasons and if there is a vote on the floor. I bet it would pass with that I will open up to any of my colleagues. You might want to chat or discuss that as well. 

This senator petty quitter from the 40th again, Jim, I would just say that the senate always takes roll, call votes, that's how we do it unless it's an amendment and then that can be on a voice vote, but there are times when we do division or there's also a roll. Call for those as well, but if this bill gets to the floor. And is voted on there will be accountability in the senate. 

Any other questions on the phone? If not last opportunity here in the room, anyone have any questions here. 

Someone back there, I just can't wait to bolster. Well if you were saying, and that's just to mention the numbers of those who her injured, but not guilt, the sustain life-changing injuries during these things. 

So the point we made those who are injured well, not killed or injured in the that is the obvious harm that's done there. And you know, I guess let me I'll just go add to that before we wrap up and then I think because we're getting a lot a little bit early, might. Be had a chance to someone at once here in the room, but um. 

Nicole, welcome home so ball coming up, so, follow me, Paul, someone who you know, after that shooting macoteo, his son was that that gathering of young people and you have to your question right, if someone was injured and badly injured in and that, well, I guess my list of apologists, if you want to say anything about that? I think Paul's assistant sponsored initiative 1639 and I think it was literally the first person I reached out to after that. That shooting Michael to you and really helped me get to the place I am in terms of proposing his bills and promising to close them every year until we get them passed. 

So maybe the best way to close this press conference is with. I'll have a few and a few words to go right ahead. 

Thank you, Bob, thank you so much for proposing this legislation to the point made, uh, there's great harm that's done beyond the loss of life. Those that are injured are changed for the rest of their lives and the loved ones around those people are changed. That shooting in Michael Thiel was absolutely heartbreaking. 

And not only to my family but to the community as well, and it needs to change, it's going on for too long. Yes, enough is enough. And this legislation can help to change things that can help to reduce the level of gun violence in our culture here in Washington State, it's it's time, thank you. 

Give me the bankruption so based on your being here, the press release is available. Feel free to help fall the team. We have questions thanks to each and every one of you for being here today and taking time from your schedule, we greatly appreciate your strong support and we'll be available. 

We got it maybe 15 minutes here in the room to answer 1 on 1, but we should probably be clearing out by 115. Thanks so much everybody have a great day? 

And speaking to Lawson's, let me, I always would tell them, is look, you're learning civil procedure, you're learning from a lot and I can see marcane. Thank you so much you can see in parking write these these rules you're trying to learn about. I said just remember that every case, you ever have as a lawyer. 

Whatever it is, there are for people, there are impacts to that case on real people and don't ever lose track of it, I think it's easy for lawyers to lose track of that. And so I always concluded my presentation with after the first case, we had against the administration was that the first Muslim. Travel ban. 

And Washington was the 1st day too, lots of challenging that as as you know, and we thank you, thank you and and we won. And after that happened, I began receiving some letters, you have handwritten letters to the mail and I remember the 1st day I had my executive assistant said, Hey, Bob, you've got some letters. From people and there's like 25 or 30 of them. 

And I thought man, that's crazy that people would write about a case like that, so I remember thinking, well, someone from my state, it came from all around accident. I love people from my state handwrote alert to me how to hand write a letter back and so that became a thing that I did. And one of the letters that I received what's from a kid and she was the same age as my kids at the time, she was like 7 or 8 and she was from one of the countries impacted by the Muslim travel ban. 

Excuse me, rockery wrong as I recall and I wish I had the image for you. But she's 2, it's a, it's a kid, right. Of course, I'm sure her parents put her up to it, but she drew like a cartoon picture of me like in a Cape. 

If you're like consuming tape and and she wrote, she had an arrow to my arm, that's at mussfels muscles for my armor and her letter, which was so sweet, she wrote, she wrote, because you stood up, I can be here, you know, when you think about like me, II put that image up for the lawsuit to see because Right, that kid may not understand equal protection due process, whatever those things are in the Constitution, I can't understand an impact, and that's based on a case using the Constitution or a kick, a group on Queen, a hill, a few blocks away, we can file a lawsuit against the President. 

It can stop the unconstitutional racist policy from being implemented right. You can do that in our country because of that constitution, I wanted those lawsuits to see that right, that every time you have a case, think about somebody who's impacted by that case. And so when I think what constitution means to me. 

I think a lot about right. That's I try to communicate to my team, and we have a case is that there are real impacts and that's the beauty of the play, right? It just brings that out. 

I think that's often missing in-law schools, I think it's often missing when lawyers like me talk about the law is those impacts like, that's what to make. That's what to me. It resonates so deeply with the performance, is, it craws that out and obviously and joyous ways and all the things that comes through in the performance. 

I think that's what everything supposed to me, by the way, by the way, I should mention the person I'm gonna do when I walk out of here though is It's going to text, my chief deputy and say, we need to hire Leah as soon as we cross the can, that's the first thing I'm going to do I know she's still in here, but that's that's the first thing we're going to do and Italy, if you're listening, the Washington ages office has the best civil rights division of any office in the country. That's a fact that's a fact we'd love to have you. 

Speaking of your office, having the best civil rights team in the country, is there anything that your team is working on right now that you are willing or able to share that is either pregnant to the show or just very present on Washington and zions, we're sure they're not. There's always a lot right? That's going on. 

And I guess when I would say that was something else touched on in the show. So that's obviously extremely topical right now is reach out to freedom for women, our country and of course, in our state in light of the dobs decision by the Supreme Court over ruling roe v Wade, I guess what I would say about that is that it was some time before that decision came. Out, you know, it seemed to me pretty clear. 

That's what the Supreme Court was going to do. And so we again, I began putting together a team in the office, how much like we did after Donald Trump was elected, but before we took office, we began thinking about what kind of cases we may be, we could bring a few implemented policies that he said he would do as a candidate and so we have about 20. Folks in our office who work on these issues of reproductive freedom We kept thinking about situations to make sure that individuals in Washington, our protective, for example, let's say you're an individual Washington and you go across-the-board of Idaho, to assist them, my friend with an abortion by a pickurup and driver back across the Washington state, paying for the abortion. 

What legal civil or criminal implications could there be for that woman? Or the provider here in Washington, if the state likes idle get to say, like idle adopts what more and more states are doing, which is extremely stringent, radical laws seeking 2 sanction individuals, civilly or criminally for those kinds of actions and so. That's been the worst thing a lot of time thinking. 

And from my perspective, obviously my job is dependent force washing state law. Thankfully, from my perspective to people well through the initiative process, codified the protections of a roe V Wade through the initial process that people did that, and maybe just one really don't start add. But conversation of constitutions is that This play was obvious about the federal constitution. 

We have a state constitution as well. That was adopted in 1889 by a group of white men, of course and one thing that you probably all know is a state constitute, there's actually kind of a growing interest estate, many constitutions in part, because a state count's a state constitution cannot take away rights. In the federal constitution, if I can add rice, you can have additional protections through a state constitution. 

And so in the context of roe v Wade, for example, you know, it's certainly my belief in my team's been a lot of time looking at our state constitution because our state constitution actually has Pretty strong privacy rights embedded in our state constitution, which is different than many other state countries. So think about how to be a creative arguments, if, for example, there's a national ban on abortion, right? God forbid from my perspective, let's make sure we're prepared for a workspace scenario, because Okay, as your attorney, I feel to my job to be prepared for worst case scenarios that was to happen. 

Our team is ready to happen. Do you have a favorite amendment, you know, I, it's like asking if they have a favorite kid, right? So II don't, I don't, I don't have a favorite. 

I don't have AA, no I don't think I do I guess what I would say is that? You look, I'm no constitutional scholar, right? You want like my sister general milburstow for that, right? 

But obviously, I think about the Constitution a lot, it's a big part of it, how do I spend my time and well, I couldn't say, there's a favorite. I will say that that I am appreciate it. Maybe I'll highlight 2 things 1 is I do. 

Especially value, the checks and balances inherent in the Constitution. I think that is act is a genius there. I think that's more often than not does work number 2 with specific amendments, I will say, you know the First Amendment. 

The Frames of speech is bring up my speeches. I feel that now in that, especially like in the 4 years of the Trump administration, where look, I could say what I wanted, I could do that and nobody's going to put me in jail, right? I wasn't jeopardizing, I've seen my kirs, my fire of law 6 against the President in front speaking of moments every time, by the way, and then I wasn't going to go to jail for that right and And that no I don't take that for grant, I remember I was walking. 

Maybe I was walking from home from school once when she was during those years, she was little and I remember talking about that, right. I remember saying, to her eating, you know, it's it's really? It's important that I could live in another country where I couldn't do that if she was asking about the work I was doing. 

I say there are a lot of countries where if I did that? You know, they put me in jail, I remember she said, well, what would you do if you look one of those countries would you still would you still do it? I remember not being sure have answered that question, right? 

I said, well, it's hard Katie, right, because if I did it, they will meet all night, I wouldn't see you anymore. I will see Jack and I wouldn't see your mom right? That'd be hard, so for me, I just really valued that During that time, I believe it, I was free to do that right and people could support it or not support it, but I was free to it. 

I'd have to worry about that. And so I don't have the favorite, but I will say, during those years, I really that really resonated with me during a time. Calling back to an earlier moment in the show, they've talked a lot about the ninth amendment and how no one actually really knows what the ninth amendment is. 

Did you prepare for this? Okay and I was like, hold on, do you have any thoughts or opinions on the ninth amendment, if you don't know which what the ninth amendment is, you have a handy dandy pocket constitution right up a number, it's If Joe Biden's talked about the ninth amendment recently, so in-law school, I don't recall it ever coming up. Maybe I'm wrong. 

I was putting into conversation to law when I was in-law school, maybe came up, I don't recall it. It's not a big focus, typically in-law school Beast when I went to law school but it is, I think it was mentioned in the play. That is, essentially. 

I think it's one sentence, and it essentially does contemplate, aren't be this idea that you can't write in every right that you have in the Constitution. So hate this reserves, other additional rights, and maybe what I would say about it is that going back to maybe roe b Wade, that? Thinking about the Constitution and this current Supreme Court U Supreme Court that we have, and the challenges inherent with that court is, I do think it's incumbent upon lawyers like myself to utilize different parts of constitution may be in different ways, and I do think that the ninth amendment has the potential. 

Because of its openness to those additional rights with the right court grabs in the future. I don't think this current court is typically interested in that to be candid. But II do think that the ninth amendment has the potential to emerge in a more significant way then it currently, then it currently is known, and that's new In some ways with the Constitution you see that as time goes on, there are some amendments that get virtually no attention then time goes by and suddenly it gets a rebirth, right? 

And so I think that is possible with the ninth amendment, we have time for a few audience questions I've been thinking it. Alright, see one up there. Oh, awesome. 

So the question is that is tough, so the question is, do I think there's a possibility of using the Constitution to solve America's poverty problem. Well, I mean may, the 6 is back to the ninth amendment right that there are right that there are. They're that that is the type of memory you turn 2 to try and address something like that certain rights that may be that aren't spilled out somewhere else in the Constitution that you could use an amendment like that, I guess a couple things I would say is you would need to have. 

A court that's receptive to that by court say the U Supreme Court, you know, to be candid, my really sophisticated analysis at the US Supreme Court and the work that I do, and I've told my team this, and it's not really a joke when I say this to my team. But I say, my goal right now, with the current Supreme Court is to void, having any case that we care about as a state appear before the u Supreme Court, right? But that is literally my approach and I get avoid at all costs. 

And so you would need to have some things come together for that to happen. What I would say though, is that it may seem that folks don't think about solving that problem through the Constitution, but that was the case for you name the issue, right that you name the issuer at 1 time, it may not seem possible as time goes on lawyers get created, they make their arguments and that could happen so, but I think again, maybe looking at the ninth amendment person like that would be possible. By the way, I should mention, by the way, how do I forget my sister, my brother-in-law here? 

And so I mentioned my sister Ann because well, they're both have theater history and drama degrees PhD for my sister. So I'm right, I think counts, right, I've got the history drama family, but most impressively my way here. She called me up and she said that she came to the first. 

Ever performance at the Seattle rep when she was 9 years old king Lear, she was here for one with my dad. So that's there, you go. So Seattle roughly left the Seattle rep, yeah, any additional right there in the middle. 

Yes, we're called district question already. So the question goes to many hospitals here in Washington across the country are owned by the Catholic Church and operated by the Catholic Church? And the impact that could have on reproductive health options for women here in Washington or presuming in other other states as well, and and I think just open-ended question of what that might mean. 

So speaking as a Catholic, I agree with you, that that is a concern. So I think what we're maybe I can speak a little more broadly about is with this quick. Accord, in particular, and this has been coming for some time, I think in the courts is the intersection of religious freedom in many contexts. 

You've point on one very specifically forcing it played out at spu, for example, right? There's a they're in the news right now, so the football coach in high school praying it in on and on, not right. And that is a challenge, right that balancing out, I'm going to come on my right to. 

We just were in church the other day, right that that religious frame, we have, but also when that religious freedom empowers are right, you have whatever that may be this, in this case, we're talking about the right. For reproductive choices. Yeah, II think what you'll see more and more is. 

The court seems willing to take on those cases and ruled those cases find the court has a certain orbitation when it comes to those that may not be the one that you particular or I wouldn't necessarily agree with, you know my job as Attorney General, we've not had a direct case on that. Necessarily, that's come up. But if you want to sort of do a deep time on a week do issue ag opinions on issues that come app from kind of time, so we did a number of years go issue an ag opinion that's quite lengthy and more detail that we probably want to get to hear, but if you're interested, if you simply research my name that issue and hospitals here in Washington State, we issue that opinion. 

Several years ago, if probably get more information you possibly ever want to know, but it would lay at least sort of the stay, the law and where things are at currently, but again, things are evolving quickly when it comes to to those issues and that one, in particular, see someone who regulations are so way up in the back. There? And the question is, do, I, yeah, right? 

We can buy that, right? But do I foresee any successful challenges to citizens united, I look before I get my my one word answer, I just will share with you, I ama, I, I'm, I try to be very realistic about things and practical about things. And the answer is no, no I don't. 

And that's not the answer I want to give you, but But it is most certainly, the case, there is 0 chance. This court is interested in changing that 0 chance. In fact, uh, a fair amount of my attention when it comes to sort of transparency elections, those issues is actually defending enforcing Washington states quite robust law around these issues so once can go back to the people Jolene, unsold in a former congresswoman, but long before she was a congresswoman, she was assistant activist, and she and a number of other assistant activists, like in 1972 or many, many years ago. 

Put initiative about that passed. That sudden place are framework for transparency in our elections. We actually have had litigation to that grab a case right now against Facebook for them, not following the law on if you long story very short, if you see a TV ad, a political, I excuse me on a TV station, you can go to Cairo TV and ask for the information about who's paying for that ad. 

How much are they paying for the ad? Who the contact information is how many points they're buying for the ad, the radio station newspapers, you name it. Well, campaigns buy political ADS, for example, on social media Facebook did not want to follow that law. 

We file loss against them and they responded by bringing a bunch of DC lawyers and challenging the constitutionality of that law that you all took place. Thankfully, my team beat those DC lawyers about a week ago, right? That's the good news, and and I've asked the court to issue the maximum find against Facebook, which would be 24.6 million, not that counting. 

Every dollar was 24.6 million would be the maximum penalty so but that is something that we have? That's actually it is important, right? It doesn't solve all the promises united, not buy a long shot with dark money and have been the recipient of millions of dollars of Political tax paid for by dark money. 

I can appreciate the importance of of what citizens united did and what it did not do. And so, but I don't see a change. I'm sorry for the longer answer, but I'm from a practical standpoint. 

No, but but there are state laws like washings that can't help on those issues and provide transparency, and it's my job to defend those things. Wait time for maybe 2 more questions going over here. 

Yeah, it's a good question. The question is, it's been a long time since a meaningful amendment has passed the concentration. I think it's been 50 years now, as long as I've been alive since a sort of meaningful amendment has passed amendments past the Constitution do I see any change in that coming, sorry to be the If a short one word, no answer, but the answer is no, I'll just be honest. 

It's no, it's so hard to alter the Constitution and well, look on the debate, which is fascinating the debate at the end of the play. I'm firmly in the camp of Hey keeping the Constitution, that's it, a key challenge I see with it is the singular inability as a country to Bring changes to it because the burden is SO high to pass Congress and pass the state to that is a huge huge challenge and but no I don't see changes. Look that would have been my answer probably 10 years ago, but it would have been maybe a little less certain than is now, and I think the reason, it's more firmly grounded as being a no is well ult what you all know I'm not telling you that you don't know, but our country is so divided. 

And the number of states you need to pass amendment along the type that we're talking about presuming that would be significant meaningful change in the direction on some of the court cases in the Supreme Court that II do not see that happening now, all right, one last question, which is always a trickiest, who's got the last 1? This one right over here, hi, yeah, so the question goes to a lawsuit. We had against jewel tools, a large corporation that that creates beeping products that are overrutilized by young people, obviously, and you know, and so I want, we filed a lawsuit against a jewel that recently settled their paying. 

I wanna say it's like 26 million bucks for something at the state of Washington that money to be used for the state to help with avoid kids getting addicted to to their products or once state other states have filed their own their own lawsuits as well. I guess I just would say about that sort of at a high level is You know, well, once again and think about cases is having impact on real people, no vaping has become so ubiquitous in our high schools. And it's look if you got kids or grandkids out there or nieces or nephews I mean talk to them about it, you know, it's a huge challenge and and and the addiction issues we see with that are huge, and so for me. 

What the case was basically about was them being aware of some of these issues, but obviously, advertising and promoting their products, the way that was deceptive and underplaying the addictive qualities. That's why we found a lawsuit and had the large recovery we did and so no part of my job, I guess as we start. To wrap up, is this is a necessaris or constitutional, but is a big part of Is if you are an individual in Washington, what are your chance of suing jewel right from a practical standpoint or any large corporation that violates the law, it's extremely difficult. 

There are many wonderful things about our system of government about the rule of law. Because I tell you, lawstudents all the time write. The law is only meaningful. 

If you have someone who can advocate and knows how to advocate on your behalf and so it's why I often encourage lawsums to go into public service right public service like Lee, right, but you can go into public service. She can use her considerable talents to be that advocate for folks, and that's where we come in, right, we can take on powerful corporations like Facebook or like jewel, that individual from a practical standpoint are really, really limited, but we can do that on their behalf. And I have to say that as one the more region. 

Rewarding parts of the job is being able to do that. Yeah, and so it may just be a thing. Thanks. 

And so so maybe it's the final thought, I just will say, I look, um, it's a really challenging time in our country right now, and I am a glass, half full kind of person. I'll confess that right from the get-go, but I really do worry about the future of our country for my kids, right? And then I just don't take for granted any more that they will be raised in the kind of democracy that I was raised and I just, I'm not naive to that anymore. 

And I never thought I would ever honestly, I mean, I would have thought I would ever say that to an audience of people. Here, not far from where I grew up. I really believe that to be true, and I guess what I would say is that I liked what Leah said at the I think is under her clothes where she said, Hey, you look, it's a comment upon all of us, right, 2, you are a part, whatever that part is right, whatever it is we can. 

Do we all have a job to do? And I really believe it to be a job sort of our duty to do what we can to Preserve what is good about the Constitution and seek to change what needs to be changed to the Constitution or with our courts or with the big lie. And I believe there's a direct line from the big lie to being an existential threat to our Republic and our government. 

And so, you know, I guess I would say as your Attorney General, I really view that as You know, if you ask me if I think about every day. Yes, it's constitution and it's it's how to with the wonderful people in my office who my God could make a whole lot more money at a big private law firm right than the money that we were able to pay them and you were able to pay them in the ag's office, but I do view that as sort of fundamental to our work and what we do, and I know my team field. It was that very deeply, thanks so much for having me. 

I really appreciate it again, Albertson's owns a Safeway and Hagan Kroger owns QFC and Fred Meyer, so just give you an idea of the scale we're talking about here these 2 companies alone and all of their brands, we currently have more than 700000 employees. Nearly 5000 stores across 49 states, Kroger alone has more than 21000 workers right here in washing state. They have a combined annual revenue more tha $200 billion importantly, more than half of all supermarkets in Washington State. 

I'll currently own by Ida Kroger or albertsons. They account for more than 50% of all supermarket sales in our state. They also naturally directly compute each other in communities all across our state that's the nature of competition opportunis, for example, has lowered its prices in many Washington communities to compete with print Meyer and qfc, and highlights its advertisement's products, where it offers a better deal. 

This merger is bad for Washington consumers, if Kroger and albertons merged, they will simply put dwarf the competition shoppers will have fewer choices and less competition, and that results at higher prices put another way. Nobody buys their cheap competitor to lower prices. Now, in late 2022 Kroger, albertsons announced their plan to merge. 

Even company executives have expressed that this merger might be legal as part of the discovery process during our investigation there, we reviewed hundreds of thousands of records. We uncovered internal chats between corporate executives and other employees. After rumors of a proposed merger surfaced, a Vice President of marketing with albertsons wrote. 

And I'm quoting, you are basically creating a monopoly in grocery with the merger, it makes no sense quote. It'd be like AT&T and Verizon merchant. We agree. 

This makes no sense. This is especially true in Washington, which, if this merger would be allowed to go through Washington would be one of the most impacted states in the entire country, the proposed merger will luminate headed competition between the 2 largest grocery operators in our state. To make matters worse, if the merger is allowed to go forward the next closest competitor to this newly merged company would be a wholesale. 

Just excuse me, the wholesale distribution company that has never operated a store in Washington State before in order to fix the competitive problems of this merger Kroger, albertsons have offered to sell off. 413 stores nationwide, including 104 in Washington because you center, the scale of the impact on Washington, their proposed buyer. However, it is a company called CS wholesale grocers, which is primarily a wholesale distributor CNS currently only operates 23 supermarkets nationwide. 

That means CS would go from operating 23 supermarkets to nearly 450 around the country in Washington. That means they go from literally 0 204 stores, becoming the second largest supermarket operator in the state virtually overnight. The newly combined corporate albertsons brands will be immediately positioned to outcompete. 

They're former supermarkets, while they transition to a new owner at the same time, CNS will still be trying to adjust, becoming a large-scale nationwide supermarket operator if those stores fail, hundreds of washingtonians could lose their jobs. We have seen the situation very. We've seen a situation very similar to this play out before the current proposed divestiture plan. 

There is a striking resemblance to Albertson's failed divestiture of washing based doors to a similarly unqualified buyer taken less than a decade ago, so take you back in time about a decade. Because a part of Albertson's 2015 merger was Safeway, a 146 albertsons and Safeway stores, including 26 in Washington State, we're sold to Hagan. At the time, Hagen was a regional supermarket chain, with only 18 stores that lacked the infrastructure to rapidly expand to a multi-state. 

National grocery retailer, not surprisingly, it's struggled to operate the divested stores and less than a year later, Hagan was forced to file for bankruptcy. Albertsons was able to reacquire more than 50 of its divested stores, including 14 washing locations, in some cases, take a dollar per store. At auction. 

It now owns and operate taking stores from Washington State if CNS fails to bring us back to our current situation if CNS fails, it is also possible Kroger could be allowed to require its divested supermarkets, just like albertsons did after Hagan's failure as the saying. Goes, fool me once shame on you. Fool me twice. 

Shame on me and even if seen us, we're able to break the trend and succeed, where Hagen failed, there are still many communities throughout Washington State, where Kroger has not offered to sell stores and we're able to enjoy substantially lessened competition. Or a near monopoly as a result of this merger just last week, Kroger and Alberson said publicly that this merger quote, it will expand competition. Lower prices protect union jobs and enhance customers' shopping experience. 

But that's not what they're saying behind closed doors after the merger was announced and Albertson's executive wrote. ", it's all about pricing and competition and we know, and we all know the prices will not go down, listen to what their own executives are saying this makes no sense prices will not go down. There are clear warning signs alerting us to potentially disastrous consequences for washingtonians. 

Look at this proposed merger succeeds, grocery prices are already too hot. These companies emerging so they can increase profits, not help washingtonians with the grocery bills. I also want to add how much we appreciate my team and I were talking about this before we came out here, we received many Complaints from consumers from washingtonians across the state, who wrote to my team expressing their concerns about this and who I want to communicate to those folks is, thank you for writing and that those voices are a part of our complaint that through the voices of those consumers, those washingtonians running for office. 

Form part of our complaint that we're communicating to the judge here in Ken county, free enterprise is built on companies competing and that competition benefits everyone without sufficient competition, shoppers, face choices, shoppers face fewer choices and they face higher prices. Would be competitors face a Rick system that any opportunity compete? Our job is to make sure there's a level playing field for washing consumers, and that means pushing back against the consolidation of power that destroys free enterprise and harms washingtones, and we're prepared to do all we can do. 

To avoid that outcome, we'll be seeking to block this merger nationwide, we have filed our complaint in King County superior court today. A tree tracer steps. The heat is on what so was it closing end and everyone's a suspect, are you just quoting cop shows that's what they want us to think he's just playing club shows to opt for this, we're not detectives, we're connectivity experts, if millions of communities rely on us for internet and mobile, you can to optimum, where local is big time. 

I support the right to bear arms. I support the second amendment, but within that second amendment, just like there are limits on the First Amendment premier speech, there can be common sense limits to that constitutional right states can enforce regulations that have been upheld by our federal courts across the country. For example, limiting high capacity magazines raised in the age of purchase and solid at 21. 

Those are constitutional common sense and still protect law, abiding gun owners. 

But those proposals did not make it through this past legislative session, despite new democratic control in Olympia and national focus on the issue of gun safety in the wake of parkland Florida. 

Yeah, it's not right. What's going on. It's just not, and you know, I take no joy and a criticism of people I respect in the state legislature, but they just need you a better job. 

The Washington State ag Bob Ferguson hinted as citizen initiative, could be on the horizon. I would be sure. 

I'm surprised if there was not something on the ballot this year or an effort put something on about this year around raising the age purchasing assault weapon, let me hike past the magazines or even banning the sale of assault weapons. I just think there's a lot of momentum a lot of folks are interested in. It takes a lot of work that gets me on the ballot but I'd be surprised. 

There wasn't a serious attempt made to put some combination of those proposals on the ballot for the people this year, because the legislature simply won't do it. 

The issue of gun safety is politically complicated with impassioned activists on both sides of the debate, but today it was thousands of students who stole the spotlight and asked lawmakers to act to make sure their schools are safe. 

There's no one solution to this huge promotion. 

In addition to an ongoing discussion of gun safety, the ag's office will become part of a new state task force to try and identify and intervene against potential threats. The group will look at school safety and try to identify where there might be gaps, I think. 

We can have a more comprehensive approach on giving more clear guidance for students or other folks or parents to notify law enforcement. 

The goal that unites everyone, preventing future tragedies communities are now leaning on each other for support and ideas as the nation continues to mourn the lives loss one month ago today. 

But when there's a shooting like this, ags are often having a conversation and comparing notes about what we're doing what we're trying in our respective states, what's working, what's not working? And so that's a conversation that's certainly taking place directly from ag. To ages. 

And that includes talking about what laws are working or not working and one law that we do have on the books here in Washington State is the newly passed initiative, extreme risk protection orders where you can actually petition a court. If you're worried about a loved one, if there's evidence that they might be a threat to themselves or others, and I keep bringing this up because it's come to light. Recently that a lot of folks here in Washington and families aren't aware that this is a new Tool, a new law that we already have in place and now other states are actually passing something similar, including the Florida legislature. 

And where does one access this? 

This protection ordered police, if they're concerned, you contact local law enforcement, and then that starts the process to figure out how to petition a court. You go before a judge there obviously has to be due process and evidence, but it's an important law to highlight since it is in place here in Washington State. 

Washington's Attorney General is suing the private for-profit company that operates a Northwest detention center in Tacoma, the facility houses detainees going through immigration proceedings, many of whom are facing deportation. Now, according to the suit Geo group is paying those detainees as little as a dollar a day to do things like clean or cook alleging that sometimes they get paid with just Snacks, so like chips or candy or something for the work that they're doing so joining us this morning is Attorney General Bob Ferguson to talk about that suit. 

So legally speaking. What is wrong with them paying detainees with chips or candies to work well. The problem is that they're private, the poor profit corporation and the folks who are at the dimension center are not facing criminal charges and civil proceedings. 

So for those reasons they're like any other business that operates in Washington State, you got to follow our laws and that includes our minimum wage laws. Now they say that this is a voluntary work. Program and that your lawsuit is completely bogus, so if it is a voluntary work program, couldn't these inmates or these detainees, they're not inmates chose to just say, yes, well, I'd like to work. 

I'd like to do something or I don't want to, yeah, if that's their argument court. They're going to lose badly. Think of this way, if you run a restaurant in our state, we have minimum wage 11 bucks an hour. 

You can't say as a defense, I'm only paying 5 bucks an hour, because folks are volunteering to come bus tables or wash dishes and they agree with $5 an hour. No, if you're a private for-profit corporation, you're running a business operation in our state, you got to pay the minimum wage, you can't say. Folks are simply volunteering to work at my placement business. 

So I want to talk about the extent of this because we've had this detention facility for what 12 years, yeah, that they've been operating there since 2005 I believe in Tacoma, that's correct. And they have a 140 other facilities across the entire country. There's been some complaints at a facility out of Colorado, so if you have an issue with how they've been paying detainees. 

Why didn't take you so long to figure it out? Well, I've been turning Jennifer. 5 years 2 years ago I created civil rights in my office, we didn't have one before so we now have a team that did affirmative work in this way in the ag's office for many, many decades. 

So that seems unbusy, as you know, some things with the federal government, but there's an issue been paying attention since we first started. The civil rights unit we've been doing investigation profile talking to detainees, look at the contract geohads, with the federal government to run the facility, and we decide this is the right time to bring this litigation once we're prepared and we've completed our investigation, so when you guys talk. To these detained needs and I know some of your attorneys have what are kind of the stories that they're weaving for you about feeling like they have to do this work and the compensation that they're getting yeah, well, so a little bit of both some folks say they feel pressured to do the work. 

Others say they do volunteer for it. They do receive one things consistent is it's a dollar a day for their work sometimes assigned that to get paid, as you mentioned before in chips or candy and again, this is an out-of-state. Before proper corporation, their revenue is in the billions each year to large corporation and they're running a private institution here. 

But for folks who are facing civil proceedings, not criminal. So there's no exception under our way to rules in Washington State for these folks, so it's very different than a government-run jail there, you don't pay the minimum wage or privately run institution like this, you do, but why not? I mean, I get some of the things that struck me about this because we don't pay our own state prison inmates and grant, you're right? 

We're talking about criminal versus civil, but we have them, you know, locked app, and they're doing jobs, they're fighting fires for pennies, so if we're going to kind of be this stake, it's like fair pay, and it's not forced labor then why does that carry over to our state prison system. Also, it stay persistent, it applies to begin. This is a private poor profit corporation right that runs a facility for individuals who are not facing criminal charges. 

Maybe these individuals are returned back to our community, there's folks have been in our state for many, many years they have families here. They're seeking asylum from a foreign country. So it's a very different situation so to keep in mind these folks Geo, they're making millions dollars every year, exploiting these detainees who are at this facility, that's not okay, and also takes away jobs from people outside the facility if they had to pay them in wage, which they should that opens app job opportunities for people throughout our state and throughout our community, I thought, that was an interesting aspect of the argument, which is, if you don't care about the detainees and how they're being treated and how they're being paid, these jobs could be going to people in our county and I'm so to be clear. 

They run this facility outside of the guards, the facilities basically run on the labor of these detainees, the cleaning the cleaning the restrooms, the laundry. You name it, this is being done by the detainees for a buck, a day. Basically, that's just money profits for this company, so let's say that you go forward and you win this lawsuit. 

How do you rectify something like this? I mean, you guys have been saying you want all this money that they would have otherwise had to pay, but we're talking about years and years hundreds, if not thousands of detainees who are getting this dollar a day or chips are candy. So if at the end of the day, a court sides with you, how does geogroup make this right? 

So we're asking forests for them to return essentially their ill gun gains the money they profited off the labor of these detainees. So a corps would have to calculate using information provided by Geo about how many folks worked, how many hours that was do the math and what they should have paid. That's the amount they need to return back to the state of Washington to the state, or to the detainees who had to do that labor are you going to give it back to the people who worked for a dollar a day, if we can identify those folks as an organization, so we've always tried to do is get money back in the pockets of folks who are directly harmed. 

There may be some challenges here because the actions go back a number of years and those folks may no longer be in the state they may be. Hard to find, but that it's the goal if we can do that, that's absolutely what we try to do, all right, it's interesting. It's going to be an interesting one to watch. 

And I think that people have you've had a lot of lawsuits lately a lot of high-profile ones here with the Trump administration into some of these particularly around immigration, you know, I know that a lot of people We're watching very closely in this one is Would theoretically would it impact a lot of these other facilities that this company runs 140 across the country? Possibly, although keep in mind, each state has different laws when it comes to minimum wage in Washington State. We have a very strong minimum wage law that has very few exceptions, so, each state's a little bit different. 

So the broader implications are hard to tell who have big implications for this facility right here in Washington State. The states would have to look at that individual exactly right of Ferguson, we always appreciate your times for everything here. We'll be back after this. 

Hello, everybody, my name's Bob Ferguson. And I'm the Attorney General for the state of Washington and thanks all of you for joining us for this important symposium and also thank you so much to the Spokane Tribe for that beautiful victim prayer to get the symposion started. I also want to thank a law school that's for proposted, uh, this event and the party we've had including this together, but let's just be direct about the issue. 

That's in front of us science shows at black contiguous and people of color and low-income communities. Air the brunt. Of the impacts of environmental problems and climate change, let me just give you a few examples of what I'm talking about. 

A research team led by the university of Washington and the university of Minnesota found that black and Hispanic Americans bear a disproportionate burden from air pollution. Wish that's generated, and mainly I play Americans, my Americans experienced 70% less the potion it generate. On the other hand black Americans experience, 56% more pollution day generate Hispanic Americans, I experienced 63%. 

Mere pollution, the big general in 2018 researchers at the EPA's national center for environmental assessment, at least a study finding that black Americans were exposed to one and a 1/2 times more particulate matter, air pollution, none carcinogen and Americans overall. A study further found that race it was literally the strongest predictor of exposure and proximity to this harmful hair flu here in Washington front and center in partnership with university of Washington. Do you age cology accused sound clean air and agency bath out environmental health disparities in Washington State? 

Their invaluable work shows that where you live, your income, erase or your language ability, it may put you at greater risk for exposure to the harmful effects of environmental pollution around the world. Indigenous peoples are among the first to face the direct consequences of climate change. I will salmon harvest here in Washington. 

It's dwindled due to a host of environmental threats from warming waters to habitat degradation in 2016 Northwest Indian fisheries commission reports. David quote, virtually all the activities, what did our treaties protect are influenced are the effects of climate change. These studies show what frontline communities have known and experience for decades, environmental justice is more urgent today than ever before. 

Environmental justice initiative was launched in honor of the 15th anniversary of Earth Day. Our office has a very important tool. Our goal is to use the legal and policy tools available to my office to lift up. 

What community members are already doing to fight for environmental justice on the ground. We'll be hiring an environmental justice attorney, the current mean are in process state to interruptings, research bill is currently working with my report on environmental justice and housing appear to this official launch. We've had 2 major emissions. 

Our office started tribal consultation and consent policy. It's literally the first that's kind across the country, and additionally, he filed an important lawsuit to protect Nita and the importance of public input and how federal agencies make decisions that have real impacts on communities. In other words, my team's on the ground fighting to uphold the rule of law and making sure the public is involved and healthy federal agencies make decisions that can have a profound impact on all of us here in the Northwest. 

We have a great supposing plan for you. We want this to be a platform for communities, disproportionately impacted by structural racism. I living on the front lines of climate change and pollution, we want to shine a light on the hard work. 

These communities across our state are doing to pursue terminal justice and we want to use the input from mist symposium to inform decisions, propose new policy solutions and target litigation efforts to address critical environmental justice issues. Importantly, every panel we have will include a representative from the Washington truck, of course, have a unique perspective on these challenges. In addition, we have some exciting speakers, Jacqueline, Patterson, the director of the naacp environmental and climate justice program is our keynote speaker on day one. 

And President von sharp, a great friend and great ally is our keynote speaker on day 2. So we look forward to the symposium, we thank you for your participation in just a final word. If there's anything, my office can do to help a new court work that you're doing and you're leading on across our state, and let us know reach out to my team. 

We'll be hearing from folks in my office throughout the symposium and don't hesitate to reach out and who can be upheld as we all move forward together to address these important issues. Thanks so much.
